Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2220
Rules and regulations.

The Director of Insurance shall have the authority to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as are reasonable, necessary, and appropriate for the effective administration of sections 44-2201 to 44-2221. Such rules and regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, (1) qualifications to issue variable annuities, (2) requirements as to advertising, sales promotion, and contract provisions, (3) accounting, (4) the filing of contracts and certificates, and (5) the licensing of annuity agents.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 20, p. 1267;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 197.